California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(B) All employees, contractors, and subcontractors shall be trained on the use of an AED and the procedures to be followed in the event of an emergency, including, but not limited to, the requirement to activate the emergency medical services system as soon as possible and report the use of the AED to the local EMS agency.

(b) Each utility, and independent contractor or subcontractor of a utility, shall comply with the requirements of Section 1797.196 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) A person who, in good faith and not for
 compensation, renders emergency care or treatment by the use of an AED is not liable for civil damages resulting from any acts or omissions of the person rendering the emergency care as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 1714.21 of the Civil Code.

(d) A utility or an independent contractor or subcontractor of a utility that acquires an AED for emergency use, makes reasonable efforts to comply with the requirements of subdivision (a), and complies with subdivision (b), is not liable for any civil damages resulting from the emergency use of the AED as provided in subdivision (d) of Section 1714.21 of the Civil Code.

(e) A person who renders emergency treatment by means of an AED and is not compensated for doing so, but receives compensation for other actions as a result of their unrelated employment, does not render emergency medical care “for compensation.” 

(f) Subdivisions (c) and (d) do not apply in cases described in subdivision (e) of Section 1714.21 of the Civil Code.

(g) For purposes of this section, all of the following definitions apply:

(1) “Electrical cooperative” has the same meaning as defined in Section 2776. 

(2) “Electrical corporation” has the same meaning as defined in Section 218.

(3) “Local EMS agency” means an agency described in Section 1797.200 of the Health and Safety Code. 

(4) “Local publicly owned electric utility” has the same meaning as defined in Section 224.3.

(5) “Utility” means an
 electrical corporation, electrical cooperative, or local publicly owned electric utility.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 361, Sec. 2.   (AB 365)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Decommissioning of Nuclear Facilities [8321. - 8330.]

8321.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Nuclear Facility Decommissioning Act of 1985.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1560, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

8322.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The citizens of California should be protected from exposure to radiation from nuclear facilities.

(b) It is in the best interests of all citizens of California that the costs of electricity generated by nuclear facilities be fairly distributed among present and future California electric customers so that customers are charged only for costs that are reasonably and prudently incurred.

(c) The costs of electricity generated by nuclear facilities, including the costs of their decontamination and decommissioning, should be reduced to the lowest level consistent with public health and safety.

(d) The ultimate costs of the decommissioning of nuclear facilities are of significant magnitude, and introduce an element of financial risk to both electric customers and investors unless prudent provision is made for defraying those costs.

(e) In order to reduce both risk and ultimate costs for all of its citizens, the State of California should establish a comprehensive framework for timely payment of the costs of decommissioning, and provide for allocation of risks and costs among the respective interests.

(f) The principal considerations in establishing a state policy respecting the economic aspects of decommissioning are as follows:

(1) Assuring that the funds required for decommissioning are available at the time and in the amount required for protection of the public.

(2) Minimizing the cost to electric customers of an acceptable level of assurance.

(3) Structuring payments for decommissioning so that electric customers and investors are treated equitably over time so that customers are charged only for costs that are reasonably and prudently incurred.

(g) Decommissioning nuclear facilities causes electric utility employees to become unemployed through no fault of their own, and these employees are entitled to reasonable job protection the costs of which are properly includable in the costs of decommissioning.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1560, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

8323.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this chapter to protect electric customers, both present and future, from the risks of unreasonable costs associated with ownership and operation of nuclear powerplants. To that end, the commission or board with respect to each electric utility owning or operating a nuclear powerplant, shall develop regulations and guidelines that promote realism in estimating costs, provide periodic review procedures that create maximum incentives for accurate cost estimations, and provide for decommissioning cost controls.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1560, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

8324.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this section govern the construction of this chapter.

(a) “Board” means the board of directors or other governing body of a publicly owned public utility owning or operating a nuclear power plant.

(b) “Commission” means the Public Utilities Commission.

(c) “Electrical utility” includes both an electrical corporation subject to the jurisdiction and control of the commission and a publicly owned public utility subject to the jurisdiction and control of its board, in either case owning or operating nuclear facilities for the generation of electricity.

(d) “Decommissioning” means to remove nuclear facilities safely from service and to reduce residual radioactivity to a level that permits release of the property for unrestricted use and termination of license, or as otherwise defined by the Nuclear Regulatory Commission or its successor. Decommissioning includes other activities and costs, if any, which may be included in Internal Revenue Service regulations implementing Section 468A of the United States Internal Revenue Code.

(e) “Nuclear facilities” means the site, building and contents, and equipment associated with any activity licensed by the Nuclear Regulatory Commission, or as may be otherwise defined by the Nuclear Regulatory Commission or its successor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1560, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

8325.

(a) Each electrical corporation owning, in whole or in part, or operating nuclear facilities, located in California or elsewhere, shall establish an externally managed, segregated fund for the purposes of this chapter. In addition, each electrical corporation may establish other funds, as appropriate, for payment of decommissioning costs of nuclear facilities.

(b) The externally managed, segregated fund established pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be a fund which qualifies for a tax deduction pursuant to Section 468A of the United States Internal Revenue Code, and applicable regulations of the Internal Revenue Service adopted pursuant thereto, if that tax treatment is determined by the commission to be in the best long-term interests of the customers of the electrical utility.

(c) The commission shall authorize an electrical corporation to collect sufficient revenues in rates to make the maximum contributions to the fund established pursuant to Section 468A of the United States Internal Revenue Code and applicable regulations, that are deductible for federal and state income tax purposes, and to otherwise recover the revenue requirements associated with reasonable and prudent decommissioning costs of the nuclear facilities for purposes of making contributions into other funds established pursuant to subdivision (a).

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, an electrical utility, which is a publicly owned public utility subject to the jurisdiction and control of its board, shall establish and may manage a separate fund for purposes of this chapter. The board shall provide that the amounts of all payments into this fund are recoverable through the utility’s electric rates.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1560, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

8326.

(a) Each electrical utility owning, in whole or in part, or operating a nuclear facility, located in California or elsewhere, shall provide a decommissioning cost estimate to the commission or the board for all nuclear facilities which shall include all of the following:

(1) An estimate of costs of decommissioning.

(2) A description of changes in regulation, technology, and economics affecting the estimate of costs.

(3) A description of additions and deletions to nuclear facilities.

(4) Upon request of the commission or the board, other information required by the Nuclear Regulatory Commission regarding decommissioning costs.

(b) The decommissioning costs estimate study shall be periodically revised in accordance with procedures adopted by the commission or the board pursuant to Section 8327.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1560, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

8327.

The commission or the board shall review, in conjunction with each proceeding of the electrical utility held for the purpose of considering changes in electrical rates or charges, the decommissioning costs estimate for the electrical utility in order to ensure that the estimate takes account of the changes in the technology and regulation of decommissioning, the operating experience of each nuclear facility, and the changes in the general economy. The review shall specifically include all cost estimates, the basis for the cost estimates, and all assumptions about the remaining useful life of the nuclear facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1560, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

8328.

The expenses associated with decommissioning of nuclear facilities shall be paid from the funds established pursuant to Section 8325. If the money in the funds is insufficient for payment of all decommissioning costs, the commission or the board shall determine whether the costs incurred in excess of the money in the funds are reasonable in amount and prudently incurred. If the commission or the board determines that the excess costs are reasonable in amount and prudently incurred, the commission or the board shall authorize these costs to be charged to the customers of the electric utility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1560, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

8329.

The commission or the board shall, for purposes of establishing rates or charges, review and approve the estimated service life and estimated retirement date of all nuclear facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1560, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

8330.

Every electrical utility involved in decommissioning, closure, or removal of nuclear facilities, shall provide assistance in finding comparable alternative employment opportunities for its employees who become unemployed as the result of decommissioning, closure, or removal. The commission or the board shall authorize the electrical utility to collect sufficient revenue through electric rates and charges to recover the cost, if any, of compliance with this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1560, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Greenhouse Gases Emission Performance Standard for Baseload Electrical Generating Resources [8340. - 8341.]

8340.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Baseload generation” means electricity generation from a powerplant that is designed and intended to provide electricity at an annualized plant capacity factor of at least 60 percent.

(b) “Combined-cycle natural gas” with respect to a powerplant means the powerplant employs a combination of one or more gas turbines and steam turbines in which electricity is produced in the steam turbine from otherwise lost waste heat exiting from one or more of the gas turbines.

(c) “Electric service provider” means an “electric service provider” as defined in Section 218.3, but does not include corporations or persons employing cogeneration technology or producing electricity from other than a conventional power source consistent with subdivision (b) of Section 218.

(d) “Greenhouse gases” means those gases listed in Section 38505 of the Health and Safety Code.

(e) “Load-serving entity” means every electrical corporation, electric service provider, or community choice aggregator serving end-use customers in the state.

(f) “Long-term financial commitment” means either a new ownership investment in baseload generation or a new or renewed contract with a term of five or more years, which includes procurement of baseload generation.

(g) “Output-based methodology” means a greenhouse gases emission performance standard that is expressed in pounds of greenhouse gases emitted per megawatthour and factoring in the useful thermal energy employed for purposes other than the generation of electricity.

(h) “Plant capacity factor” means the ratio of the electricity produced during a given time period, measured in kilowatthours, to the electricity the unit could have produced if it had been operated at its rated capacity during that period, expressed in kilowatthours.

(i) “Powerplant” means a facility for the generation of electricity, and includes one or more generating units at the same location.

(j) “Zero- or low-carbon generating resource” means an electrical generating resource that will generate electricity while producing emissions of greenhouse gases at a rate substantially below the greenhouse gases emission performance standard, as determined by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 558, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

8341.

(a) No load-serving entity or local publicly owned electric utility may enter into a long-term financial commitment unless any baseload generation supplied under the long-term financial commitment complies with the greenhouse gases emission performance standard established by the commission, pursuant to subdivision (d), for a load-serving entity, or by the Energy Commission, pursuant to subdivision (e), for a local publicly owned electric utility.

(b) (1) The commission shall not approve a long-term financial commitment by an electrical corporation unless any baseload generation supplied under the long-term financial commitment complies with the greenhouse gases emission performance standard established by the commission pursuant to subdivision (d).

(2) The commission may, in order to enforce this section, review any long-term financial commitment proposed to be entered into by an electric service provider or a community choice aggregator.

(3) The commission shall adopt rules to enforce the requirements of this section, for load-serving entities. The commission shall adopt procedures, for all load-serving entities, to verify the emissions of greenhouse gases from any baseload generation supplied under a contract subject to the greenhouse gases emission performance standard to ensure compliance with the standard.

(4) In determining whether a long-term financial commitment is for baseload generation, the commission shall consider the design of the powerplant and the intended use of the powerplant, as determined by the commission based upon the electricity purchase contract, any certification received from the Energy Commission, any other permit or certificate necessary for the operation of the powerplant, including a certificate of public convenience and necessity, any procurement approval decision for the load-serving entity, and any other matter the commission determines is relevant under the circumstances.

(5) Costs incurred by an electrical corporation to comply with this section, including those costs incurred for electricity purchase agreements that are approved by the commission that comply with the greenhouse gases emission performance standard, are to be treated as procurement costs incurred pursuant to an approved procurement plan and the commission shall ensure timely cost recovery of those costs pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 454.5.

(6) A long-term financial commitment entered into through a contract approved by the commission, for electricity generated by a zero- or low-carbon generating resource that is contracted for, on behalf of consumers of this state on a cost-of-service basis, shall be recoverable in rates, in a manner determined by the commission consistent with Section 380. The commission may, after a hearing, approve an increase from one-half to 1 percent in the return on investment by the third party entering into the contract with an electrical corporation with respect to investment in zero- or low-carbon generation resources authorized pursuant to this subdivision.

(c) (1) The Energy Commission shall adopt regulations for the enforcement of this chapter with respect to a local publicly owned electric utility.

(2) The Energy Commission may, in order to ensure compliance with the greenhouse gases emission performance standard by local publicly owned electric utilities, apply the procedures adopted by the commission to verify the emissions of greenhouse gases from baseload generation pursuant to subdivision (b).

(3) In determining whether a long-term financial commitment is for baseload generation, the Energy Commission shall consider the design of the powerplant and the intended use of the powerplant, as determined by the Energy Commission based upon the electricity purchase contract, any certification received from the Energy Commission, any other permit for the operation of the powerplant, any procurement approval decision for the load-serving entity, and any other matter the Energy Commission determines is relevant under the circumstances.

(d) (1) On or before February 1, 2007, the commission, through a rulemaking proceeding, and in consultation with the Energy Commission and the State Air Resources Board, shall establish a greenhouse gases emission performance standard for all baseload generation of load-serving entities, at a rate of emissions of greenhouse gases that is no higher than the rate of emissions of greenhouse gases for combined-cycle natural gas baseload generation. Enforcement of the greenhouse gases emission performance standard shall begin immediately upon the establishment of the standard. All combined-cycle natural gas powerplants that are in operation, or that have an Energy Commission final permit decision to operate as of June 30, 2007, shall be deemed to be in compliance with the greenhouse gases emission performance standard.

(2) In determining the rate of emissions of greenhouse gases for baseload generation, the commission shall include the net emissions resulting from the production of electricity by the baseload generation.

(3) The commission shall establish an output-based methodology to ensure that the calculation of emissions of greenhouse gases for cogeneration recognizes the total usable energy output of the process, and includes all greenhouse gases emitted by the facility in the production of both electrical and thermal energy.

(4) In calculating the emissions of greenhouse gases by facilities generating electricity from biomass, biogas, or landfill gas energy, the commission shall consider net emissions from the process of growing, processing, and generating the electricity from the fuel source.

(5) Carbon dioxide that is injected in geological formations, so as to prevent releases into the atmosphere, in compliance with applicable laws and regulations shall not be counted as emissions of the powerplant in determining compliance with the greenhouse gases emissions performance standard.

(6) In adopting and implementing the greenhouse gases emission performance standard, the commission, in consultation with the Independent System Operator shall consider the effects of the standard on system reliability and overall costs to electricity customers.

(7) In developing and implementing the greenhouse gases emission performance standard, the commission shall address long-term purchases of electricity from unspecified sources in a manner consistent with this chapter.

(8) In developing and implementing the greenhouse gases emission performance standard, the commission shall consider and act in a manner consistent with any rules adopted pursuant to Section 824a-3 of Title 16 of the United States Code.

(9) An electrical corporation that provides electric service to 75,000 or fewer retail end-use customers in California may file with the commission a proposal for alternative compliance with this section, which the commission may accept upon a showing by the electrical corporation of both of the following:

(A) A majority of the electrical corporation’s retail end-use customers for electric service are located outside of California.

(B) The emissions of greenhouse gases to generate electricity for the retail end-use customers of the electrical corporation are subject to a review by the utility regulatory commission of at least one other state in which the electrical corporation provides regulated retail electric service.

(e) (1) On or before June 30, 2007, the Energy Commission, at a duly noticed public hearing and in consultation with the commission and the State Air Resources Board, shall establish a greenhouse gases emission performance standard for all baseload generation of local publicly owned electric utilities at a rate of emissions of greenhouse gases that is no higher than the rate of emissions of greenhouse gases for combined-cycle natural gas baseload generation. The greenhouse gases emission performance standard established by the Energy Commission for local publicly owned electric utilities shall be consistent with the standard adopted by the commission for load-serving entities. Enforcement of the greenhouse gases emission performance standard shall begin immediately upon the establishment of the standard. All combined-cycle natural gas powerplants that are in operation, or that have an Energy Commission final permit decision to operate as of June 30, 2007, shall be deemed to be in compliance with the greenhouse gases emission performance standard.

(2) The greenhouse gases emission performance standard shall be adopted by regulation pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(3) In determining the rate of emissions of greenhouse gases for baseload generation, the Energy Commission shall include the net emissions resulting from the production of electricity by the baseload generation.

(4) The Energy Commission shall establish an output-based methodology to ensure that the calculation of emissions of greenhouse gases for cogeneration recognizes the total usable energy output of the process, and includes all greenhouse gases emitted by the facility in the production of both electrical and thermal energy.

(5) In calculating the emissions of greenhouse gases by facilities generating electricity from biomass, biogas, or landfill gas energy, the Energy Commission shall consider net emissions from the process of growing, processing, and generating the electricity from the fuel source.

(6) Carbon dioxide that is captured from the emissions of a powerplant and that is permanently disposed of in geological formations in compliance with applicable laws and regulations, shall not be counted as emissions from the powerplant.

(7) In adopting and implementing the greenhouse gases emission performance standard, the Energy Commission, in consultation with the Independent System Operator, shall consider the effects of the standard on system reliability and overall costs to electricity customers.

(8) In developing and implementing the greenhouse gases emission performance standard, the Energy Commission shall address long-term purchases of electricity from unspecified sources in a manner consistent with this chapter.

(9) In developing and implementing the greenhouse gases emission performance standard, the Energy Commission shall consider and act in a manner consistent with any rules adopted pursuant to Section 824a-3 of Title 16 of the United States Code.

(f) The Energy Commission, in a duly noticed public hearing and in consultation with the commission and the State Air Resources Board, shall reevaluate and continue, modify, or replace the greenhouse gases emission performance standard when an enforceable greenhouse gases emissions limit is established and in operation, that is applicable to local publicly owned electric utilities.

(g) The commission, through a rulemaking proceeding and in consultation with the Energy Commission and the State Air Resources Board, shall reevaluate and continue, modify, or replace the greenhouse gases emission performance standard when an enforceable greenhouse gases emissions limit is established and in operation, that is applicable to load-serving entities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 130, Sec. 223.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3.5. Air Pollution Performance Standard for New Generation [8350. - 8350.]

8350.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Load-serving entity” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 8340.

(2) “Long-term financial commitment” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 8340.

(3) “New electrical generating facility” means an electrical generating unit for which all legally required permits have been
 received after January 1, 2011. If an electrical generating unit is added to an existing powerplant after January 1, 2011, only the incremental capacity from that unit added after January 1, 2011, is a new electrical generating facility.

(4) “Shared pollution area” means an airshed encompassing a portion of California and a portion of an
 adjacent state or country, as determined by the United States Environmental Protection Agency.

(b) A load-serving entity or local publicly owned electric utility shall not enter into, and the commission shall not approve for an electrical corporation, a long-term financial commitment with or for a new electrical generating facility constructed in California or in a shared pollution area if that facility does not meet the following requirements:

(1) If the new electrical generating facility is in California, the facility meets best available control technology (BACT) standards, to control air pollution emissions from the operation of the facility, and complies with air pollution control district or air quality management district rules and regulations, and state and federal law.

(2) If the new electrical generating facility is outside of California in a shared pollution area, the facility meets best available control technology (BACT) standards, to control air pollution emissions from the operation of the facility, that apply in the air basin in California adjacent to the facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 422, Sec. 1.   (AB 2037)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Smart Grid Systems [8360. - 8369.]

8360.

It is the policy of the state to modernize the state’s electrical transmission and distribution system to maintain safe, reliable, efficient, and secure electrical service, with infrastructure that can meet future growth in demand and achieve all of the following, which together characterize a smart grid:

(a) Increased use of cost-effective digital information and control technology to improve reliability, security, and efficiency of the electric grid.

(b) Dynamic optimization of grid operations and resources, including appropriate consideration for asset management and utilization of related grid operations and resources, with cost-effective full cyber security.

(c) Deployment and integration of cost-effective distributed resources and generation, including renewable resources.

(d) Development and incorporation of cost-effective demand response, demand-side resources, and energy-efficient resources.

(e) Deployment of cost-effective smart technologies, including real time, automated, interactive technologies that optimize the physical operation of appliances and consumer devices for metering, communications concerning grid operations and status, and distribution automation.

(f) Integration of cost-effective smart appliances and consumer devices.

(g) Deployment and integration of cost-effective advanced electricity storage and peak-shaving
 technologies, including plug-in electric and hybrid electric vehicles, and thermal-storage air-conditioning.

(h) Provide consumers with timely information and control options.

(i) Develop standards for communication and interoperability of appliances and equipment connected to the electric grid, including the infrastructure serving the grid.

(j) Identification and lowering of unreasonable or unnecessary barriers to adoption of smart grid technologies, practices, and services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 327, Sec. 1.   (SB 17)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

8361.

For purposes of this chapter, “ISO” means the Independent System Operator operating pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 345) of Chapter 2.3 of Part 1 of Division 1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 327, Sec. 1.   (SB 17)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

8362.

(a) By July 1, 2010, the commission, in consultation with the Energy Commission, the ISO, and other key stakeholders shall determine the requirements for a smart grid deployment plan consistent with Section 8360 and federal law, including the provisions of Title XIII (commencing with Section 1301) of the Energy Independence and Security Act of 2007 (Public Law 110-140). The commission shall institute a rulemaking or expand the scope of an existing rulemaking to adopt standards and protocols to ensure functionality and interoperability developed by public and private entities, including, but not limited to, the National Institute of Standards and Technology, Gridwise Architecture Council, the International Electrical and Electronics Engineers, and the National Electric Reliability Organization recognized by
 the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission. An adopted smart grid deployment plan may provide for deployment of cost-effective smart grid products, technologies, and services by entities other than electrical corporations. The smart grid technologies and services shall improve overall efficiency, reliability, and cost-effectiveness of electrical system operations, planning, and maintenance.

(b) This section does not require or authorize the commission to delay action on an application by an electrical corporation that is submitted prior to the commission determining the requirements for a smart grid deployment plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 327, Sec. 1.   (SB 17)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

8363.

This chapter shall be implemented in a manner that does not compromise customer or worker safety or the integrity or reliability of the electrical transmission and distribution system in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 327, Sec. 1.   (SB 17)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

8364.

(a) By July 1, 2011, each electrical corporation shall develop and submit a smart grid deployment plan to the commission for approval.

(b) This section does not require or authorize the commission to delay action on an application by an electrical corporation that is submitted prior to the commission’s approval of the electrical corporation’s timely filed smart grid deployment plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 327, Sec. 1.   (SB 17)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

8366.

Smart grid technology may be deployed in a manner to maximize the benefit and minimize the cost to ratepayers and to achieve the benefits of smart grid technology. The commission, in consultation with the Energy Commission, the ISO, and electrical corporations, shall evaluate the impact of deployment on major initiatives and policies including:

(a) Implementation of new advanced metering initiatives.

(b) Achievement of the renewables portfolio standard program requirements and the need to operate the smart grid of the future with a substantial increased percentage of electricity generated by eligible renewable energy resources.

(c) Achievement of state goals for reducing emissions of greenhouse gases as set forth in the California Global Warming Solutions Act of 2006 and other state directives.

(d) Achievement of the energy efficiency and demand response goals as required by Sections 454.5 and 454.55 and other state directives.

(e) Modernizing the aging utility grid infrastructure.

(f) Meeting the future energy growth needs of the state with new and innovative technologies and methods that utilize the existing assets more efficiently, result in a less environmentally adverse net impact on the state, meet stringent costs versus benefit assessments, and provide the ratepayers with new options in meeting their individual energy needs.

(g) Implementation of technology
 to improve worker safety, protection, and productivity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 327, Sec. 1.   (SB 17)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

8368.

The commission may modify or adjust the requirements of this chapter for any electrical corporation with fewer than 100,000 service connections, as individual circumstances merit.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 327, Sec. 1.   (SB 17)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

8369.

Each local publicly owned electric utility with more than 100,000 service connections, shall, by July 1, 2011, develop a smart grid deployment plan, that is consistent with federal law, including the provisions of Title XIII (commencing with Section 1301) of the Energy Independence and Security Act of 2007 (Public Law 110-140).

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 327, Sec. 1.   (SB 17)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4.5. Microgrids [8370. - 8372.]

8370.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Customer” means a customer of a local publicly owned electric utility or of a large electrical corporation. A person or entity is a customer of a large electrical corporation if the customer is physically located within the service territory of the large electrical corporation and receives bundled service, distribution service, or transmission service from the large electrical corporation.

(b) “Distributed energy resource” means an electric generation or storage technology that complies with the emissions standards adopted by the State Air Resources Board pursuant to the distributed generation certification program requirements of
 Section 94203 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations, or any successor regulation.

(c) “Large electrical corporation” means an electrical corporation with more than 100,000 service connections in California.

(d) “Microgrid” means an interconnected system of loads and energy resources, including, but not limited to, distributed energy resources, energy storage, demand response tools, or other management, forecasting, and analytical tools, appropriately sized to meet customer needs, within a clearly defined electrical boundary that can act as a single, controllable entity, and can connect to, disconnect from, or run in parallel with, larger portions of the electrical grid, or can be managed and isolated to withstand larger disturbances and maintain electrical supply to connected critical infrastructure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 566, Sec. 2.   (SB 1339)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

8371.

The commission, in consultation with the Energy Commission and the Independent System Operator, shall take all of the following actions by December 1, 2020, to facilitate the commercialization of microgrids for distribution customers of large electrical corporations:

(a) Develop microgrid service standards necessary to meet state and local permitting requirements.

(b) Without shifting costs between ratepayers, develop methods to reduce barriers for microgrid deployment.

(c) Develop guidelines that determine what impact studies are required for microgrids to connect to the electrical corporation grid.

(d) Without shifting costs between ratepayers, develop separate large electrical corporation rates and tariffs, as necessary, to support microgrids, while ensuring that system, public, and worker safety are given the highest priority. The separate rates and tariffs shall not compensate a customer for the use of diesel backup or natural gas generation, except as either of those sources is used pursuant to Section 41514.1 of the Health and Safety Code, or except for natural gas generation that is a distributed energy resource.

(e) Form a working group to codify standards and protocols needed to meet California electrical corporation and Independent System Operator microgrid requirements.

(f) Develop a standard for direct current metering in the commission’s Electric Rule 21 to streamline the interconnection process and lower interconnection costs for direct current
 microgrid applications.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 248.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

8371.5.

Nothing in this chapter shall discourage or prohibit the development or ownership of a microgrid by an electrical corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 566, Sec. 2.   (SB 1339)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

8372.

(a) Within 180 days of the first request from a customer or developer to establish a microgrid, the governing board of a local publicly owned electric utility shall develop and make available a standardized process for the interconnection of a customer-supported microgrid, including separate electrical rates and tariffs, as necessary. The separate rates and tariffs shall not compensate a customer for the use of diesel backup or natural gas generation, except as either of those sources is used pursuant to Section 41514.1 of the Health and Safety Code, or except for natural gas generation that is a distributed energy resource.

(b) The governing board shall ensure the microgrid rates and charges do not shift costs to, or from, a microgrid customer
 or nonmicrogrid customer, and shall ensure each microgrid and its components comply with the local publicly owned electric utility’s applicable regulatory requirements.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 566, Sec. 2.   (SB 1339)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4.6. Notice and Recordation of a Decarbonization Charge [8375. - 8377.]

8375.
